Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 3
CONSERVATION AND ADJUSTMENT LAW

Section

35-3-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Agricultural Conservation and Adjustment Act".

Source:

L. 37:

p. 257, § 1.

CSA:

C. 5, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-1.

35-3-102. Legislative declaration.

It is recognized and declared:

That the soil resources and fertility of the land of this state, and the economic use thereof, the prosperity of the farming population of this state, and the waters of the rivers of this state, and the prevention of floods are matters affected with a public interest;

That the welfare of this state has been impaired and is in danger of being further impaired by destruction of its soil fertility, by uneconomic use and waste of its land, by exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of its soil resources, by floods and impairment of its rivers as a result of soil erosion, and by the decrease in the purchasing power of the net income per person on farms in the state as compared with the net income per person in the state not on farms;

That said evils have been augmented and are likely to be augmented by similar conditions in other states and are so interrelated with such conditions in other states that the remedying of such conditions in this state requires action by this state in cooperation with the governments and agencies of other states and of the United States and requires assistance therein by the government and agencies of the United States;

That the formulation and effectuation by this state of state plans, in conformity with the provisions of section 7 of the "Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act", is calculated to remedy said conditions and will tend to advance the public welfare of this state.

In order to promote the welfare of the people of this state by aiding in the preservation and improvement of soil fertility, in the promotion of the economic use and conservation of land, in the diminution of exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of soil resources, in the protection of rivers against the results of soil erosion, and in the reestablishment, at as rapid a rate as is practicable and in the general public interest, of the ratio between the purchasing power of the net income per person on farms and that of the net income per person not on farms that prevailed during the five-year period, August 1909 to July 1914, inclusive, as determined from statistics available in the United States department of agriculture, and the maintenance of such ratio, the state of Colorado assents to and accepts the provisions of the "Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act" and adopts the policy and purpose of cooperating with the government and agencies of other states and of the United States in the accomplishment of the policy and purposes specified in section 7 of said act, subject to the following limitations:

The powers conferred in this article shall be used to assist voluntary action calculated to effectuate such purposes.

Such powers shall not be used to discourage the production of supplies of foods and fibers in this state sufficient when taken together with the production thereof in other states of the United States to maintain normal domestic human consumption as determined by the secretary of agriculture of the United States from the records of consumption in the years 1920 to 1929, inclusive, taking into consideration increased population, quantities of any commodities that were forced into domestic consumption by a decline in exports of particular commodities, and the quantities of substitutes available for domestic consumption within any general class of food commodities.

In carrying out the purposes specified in this section due regard shall be given to the maintenance of a continuous and stable national supply of agricultural commodities adequate to meet consumer demand at prices fair to both producers and consumers.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 257, § 2.

CSA:

C. 5, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-2.

Cross references:

For section 7 of the "Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act", see 16 U.S.C. § 590g.

35-3-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Other states of the United States" includes Puerto Rico.

"Person" includes an individual, corporation, partnership, firm, business trust, joint stock company, association, syndicate, group, pool, joint venture, and any other unincorporated association or group.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 259, § 3.

CSA:

C. 5, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-3.

35-3-104. Designation of state agency.

The department of agriculture, referred to in this article as the "department", is designated and authorized as the state agency to carry out the policy and purposes of this article and to formulate and administer state plans pursuant to the terms of this article.

The department shall perform its duties and functions as such agency under this article separately and distinctly from the performance of its duties and functions under any other law or in any other capacity; except that the department may utilize the services and the assistance of its personnel and facilities normally used in the performance of such other functions if it finds that the utilization of such services and assistance is necessary to, or is calculated to assist substantially in, the effective administration of this article and that such facilities may be utilized without interference with the effective performance of such other duties and functions.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 259, § 4.

CSA:

C. 5, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-4.

35-3-105. Administration of state plans.

The department is authorized to formulate for each calendar year and to submit to the secretary of agriculture of the United States, for and in the name of this state, a state plan for carrying out the purposes of this article during such calendar year.

The department is authorized to modify or revise any such plan in whatever manner, consistent with the terms of this article, it finds necessary to provide for more substantial furtherance of the accomplishment of the purposes of this article.

Each such plan shall provide for such participation in its administration, by voluntary county and community committees or associations of agricultural producers organized for such purposes, as the department determines to be necessary or proper for the effective administration of the plan.

Each such plan shall provide, through agreements with agricultural producers or through other voluntary methods, for such adjustments in the utilization of land, in farming practices, and in the acreage or in the production for market, or both, of agricultural commodities, as the department determines to be calculated to effectuate as substantial an accomplishment of the purposes of this article as may reasonably be achieved through action of this state, and for payments to agricultural producers in connection with such agreements or methods in such amounts as the department determines to be fair and reasonable and calculated to promote such accomplishment of the purposes of this article without depriving such producers of a voluntary and uncoerced choice of action.

Any such plan shall provide for such educational programs as the department determines to be necessary or proper to promote the more substantial accomplishment of the purposes of this article.

Each such plan shall contain an estimate of expenditures necessary to carry out such plan, together with a statement of such amount as the department determines to be necessary to be paid by the secretary of agriculture of the United States as a grant to aid of such plan under section 7 of the "Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act", in order to provide for the effective carrying out of such plan, and shall designate the amount and due date of each installment of such grant, the period to which such installment relates, and the amount determined by the department to be necessary for carrying out such plan during such period.

The department shall provide for such investigations as it finds to be necessary for the formulation and administration of such plans.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 260, § 5.

CSA:

C. 5, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-5.

Cross references:

For section 7 of the "Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act", see 16 U.S.C. § 590g.

35-3-106. Administration of funds.

The department is authorized to receive on behalf of this state all grants of money or other aid made available from any source to assist the state in carrying out the policy and purposes of this article. All such money or other aid, together with any moneys appropriated or other provision made by this state for such purpose, shall be forthwith available to said department as the agency of the state subject, in the case of any funds or other aid received upon conditions, to the conditions upon which such funds or other aid has been received, for the purpose of administering this article and may be expended by the department in carrying out such state plans or in otherwise effectuating the purposes and policies of this article, but shall not be expended or disposed of for any other purposes, nor shall any funds made available to the department for purposes other than the administration of this article be expended or otherwise disposed of in connection with the administration of this article except in providing services and assistance in the administration of this article pursuant to the provisions of section 35-3-104 and in such case only to the extent that such funds are properly available for such purpose and subject in such cases to reimbursement of the funds so expended pursuant to the provisions of section 35-3-107.

Subject to any conditions upon which any such money or other aid is made available to the state and to the terms of any applicable plan made effective pursuant to this article, such expenditures may include, but need not be limited to, expenditures for administrative expenses, equipment, cost of research and investigation, cost of educational activities, compensation and expenses of members of the state advisory committee, reimbursement to other state agencies or to voluntary committees or associations of agricultural producers for costs to such agencies, committees, or associations of assistance in the administration of this article, requested in writing by the department and rendered to the department, reimbursement of any other fund from which it has made expenditures in providing services in the administration of this article pursuant to the provisions of section 35-3-104, payments to agricultural producers provided for in any plan made effective pursuant to this article, salaries of employees, and all other expenditures requisite to carrying out the provisions and purposes of this article.

The department shall provide for the keeping of full and accurate accounts as such state agency, separate from its accounts kept in its other capacities, showing all receipts and expenditures of moneys, securities, or other property received, held, or expended under the provisions of this article and shall provide for the auditing of all such accounts and for the execution of surety bonds for all employees entrusted with moneys or securities under the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 262, § 6.

CSA:

C. 5, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-6.

35-3-107. Powers and duties of state agency.

The department shall utilize such available services and assistance of other state agencies and of voluntary county and community committees and associations of agricultural producers as it determines to be necessary or calculated to assist substantially in the effective administration of this article.

The department has authority to make such rules and regulations, consistent with the provisions of this article, and to do any and all other acts consistent with the provisions of this article, which it finds to be necessary or proper for the effective administration of this article.

The department has the authority to obtain, by lease or purchase, such equipment, office accommodations, facilities, services, and supplies, and to employ, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, such technical or legal experts or assistants and such other employees, including clerical and stenographic help, as it determines to be necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this article, and to determine the qualifications, duties, and compensation of such experts, assistants, and other employees.

All other agencies of this state are authorized to assist said department in carrying out the provisions of this article, upon written request of the department, in any manner determined by the department to be necessary or appropriate for the effective administration of this article.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 263, § 7.

CSA:

C. 5, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-7.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24; for the state personnel system, see § 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

35-3-108. Districts and communities.

The department shall designate within the state five agricultural districts. As far as practicable, such districts shall be so constituted as to contain approximately equal numbers of agricultural producers. Such districts shall include in the aggregate all of the land in the state.

The department shall also designate within each county of this state such geographic units, which shall be called communities, as it determines to be the most convenient for the administration of this article and of state plans adopted pursuant to this article, and it shall establish the boundaries of such communities.

The department may revise the boundaries of such agricultural districts and of such communities, in conformity with the respective standards prescribed in this article, at such times as it finds that such revision is necessary either to cause such districts or communities, or both, to conform to said standards or to provide for the more substantial or more efficient accomplishment of the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 264, § 8.

CSA:

C. 5, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-8.

35-3-109. Community and county committees.

The department by regulations shall provide:

For the organization within each community of a voluntary association, in which all agricultural producers who are citizens of this state and residents in such community shall be entitled to equal participation; for the selection by each such association of a community committee, composed of three members of such association; and for the selection of a chairman of each such community committee;

For the selection by the members of such community committees within each county of a county committee for such county, composed of three members of such community committees, and for the selection of a chairman of each such county committee.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 265, § 9.

CSA:

C. 5, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-9.

35-3-110. State advisory committee - sunset review. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 37:

p. 266, § 10.

CSA:

C. 5, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-10.

L. 86:

(4) added, p. 425, § 57, effective March 26.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 885, § 9, effective June 5.

35-3-111. Reports - publications.

The administrative officer within the department charged with administration of this article shall report to the commissioner at such times and on such matters as the commissioner may require. Publications made pursuant to this article and circulated in quantity outside the department are subject to the approval and control of the commissioner.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 266, § 11.

CSA:

C. 5, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 6-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-3-11.

L. 64:

p. 124, § 25.